District of Columbia statutes.
29-302.01

Incorporators.

One or more persons may act as the incorporator or incorporators of a corporation by delivering articles of incorporation to the Mayor for filing.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720